Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB506.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIII-BCHILD CARE STAFF RECRUITMENT AND RETENTION PROGRAMSection 1301-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child care center." As defined in section 1001."Children's institution." As defined in section 901. " Family child care home." As defined in section 1001. 123456789101112131415161718 "Newly hired qualified staff member." A qualified staff member who was initially hired after a qualified child care provider submits an application under section 1302-B(c)(2) but not later than six months after the qualified child care provider receives a lump sum payment under section 1302-B(e)(2)."Program." The Child Care Staff Recruitment and Retention Program established under section 1302-B."Qualified child care provider." As follows:(1) A child care provider certified by the department and that meets all of the following:(i) is a children's institution that provides child care under Article IX or is a child care center or a family child care home under Article X; and(ii) as of the date of the child care provider's submitted application under section 1302-B (c)(2) : (A) is in operation; and(B) has a child care subsidy agreement with the department.(2) The term does not include a child care provider:(i) that is under investigation for fraud;(ii) subject to a Commonwealth lien;(iii) whose certificate of compliance has been revoked, denied or not renewed; or(iv) that has a provisional license issued under section 1008(a) or a provisional certificate of compliance issued under 55 Pa. Code § 20.54(a) (relating to provisional certificate of compliance)."Qualified staff member." As follows:(1) Any of the following:(i) An employee of a qualified child care provider 20250SB0506PN0949 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 who directly supervises children.(ii) An operator of a family child care home who directly supervises children.(2) The term does not include individuals who do not directly supervise children, including child care center executives or owners, janitorial staff, food service staff or administrative or support staff.Section 1302-B. Child Care Staff Recruitment and Retention Program.(a) Establishment.--The Child Care Staff Recruitment and Retention Program is established within the department for the purpose of distributing annual lump-sum retention and recruitment payments to qualified child care providers to the extent funds are available.(b) Funding and use.--Money appropriated to the department for the program shall be distributed to qualified child care providers in accordance with this article. Money distributed to approved qualified child care providers must be used for annual lump-sum retention and recruitment payments to qualified staff members as provided under subsections (e) and (f).(c) Application.--(1) The department shall develop an application for qualified child care providers to apply for annual lump-sum recruitment and retention payments for qualified staff members and post the application on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(2) A qualified child care provider shall apply for funding within 45 days of the initial posting of the application in the form and manner as prescribed by the department.20250SB0506PN0949 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Department determination.--The department:(1) shall approve or deny an application received under subsection (c) no later than 45 days after receipt of the application; and(2) may not approve or distribute payments under this article to an applicant that is not a qualified child care provider.(e) Allocation.--Money appropriated to the department shall be allocated as follows:(1) The department shall allocate money for payments to qualified child care providers to administer individual retention bonuses of up to $1,000 per qualified staff member.(2) After allocating money for payments under paragraph (1), the department shall allocate any remaining money for payments to qualified child care providers to administer recruitment bonuses of up to $1,000 per newly hired qualified staff member. Funding under this paragraph shall be allocated based on child care provider type and licensed capacity.(f) Conditions.--The following shall apply to payments received by approved qualified child care providers under this article:(1) Payments may not supplant existing money used for staff wages, bonuses or benefits.(2) Payments may only be used for the following purposes and shall be spent within the fiscal year the payment was made:(i) Retention bonuses for qualified staff members.(ii) Recruitment bonuses for newly hired qualified staff members.(3) A qualified staff member may not receive both a 20250SB0506PN0949 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 retention bonus and a recruitment bonus within the same fiscal year.(g) Recovery.--The department may recover money distributed to a child care provider under this article if the provider does not comply with the provisions of this article or with applicable Federal or State law.(h) Provider requirements.--A child care provider that receives a payment from the department under this article shall provide documents, records and other information related to a payment made under this article in the time, manner and format requested by the department or a Federal agency or another Commonwealth agency that is authorized to audit the child care provider or the payments.(i) Records and recovery.--The department may:(1) Monitor, inspect or audit the financial, operating and accounting records of a child care provider that receives a payment under this article, as deemed necessary by the department.(2) Withhold, recover or reduce a payment of a child care provider if the provider does not comply with the provisions of this article or with Federal or State requirements.(j) Reporting.--No later than September 30, 2026, and each September 30 thereafter, the department shall issue a report to the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The report shall include the following information:20250SB0506PN0949 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The number of payments made to qualified child care providers.(2) The county in which each qualified child care provider receiving a payment is located.(3) The total number of applications received in the previous fiscal year.(4) Any other information the department deems necessary.(k) Regulations.--The department may promulgate regulations as necessary to administer the provisions of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0506PN0949 - 6 - 1234567891011